Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.300

Physician health program—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 18.71.310 through 18.71.340 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Entity" means a nonprofit corporation formed by physicians who have expertise in substance use disorders, mental illness, and other potentially impairing health conditions and who broadly represent the physicians of the state and that has been designated to perform any or all of the activities set forth in RCW 18.71.310(1) by the commission.

(2) "Impaired" or "impairment" means the inability to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of a health condition.

(3) "Physician health program" means the program for the prevention, detection, intervention, referral for evaluation and treatment, and monitoring of impaired or potentially impaired physicians established by the commission pursuant to RCW 18.71.310(1).

[ 2022 c 43 s 4; 1998 c 132 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 329; 1989 c 119 s 1; 1987 c 416 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.72.301.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1987 c 416: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987." [ 1987 c 416 s 10.]